fr: Caractéristiques du four: Étagères réglables; Mise hors tension automatique; Isolation en fibre céramique; Contrôleur numérique; Consommation d’énergie faible; Système de ventilation d'échappement; Ports d'observation/judas; Portable; Cycles de cuisson programmables; Chauffe rapide; Cordon d'alimentation réversible; Construction sectionnelle; Fonction de maintien de la température; Écran tactile; Fenêtre de visualisation; Autre
pt-PT: Características do forno: Prateleiras ajustáveis; Desligar automático; Isolamento de fibra cerâmica; Controlador digital; Energia eficiente; Sistema de ventilação de escape; Portas de observação/vigia; Portáteis; Ciclos de cozedura programáveis; Aquecimento rápido; Cabo de alimentação reversível; Construção seccional; Função de manutenção de temperatura; Ecrã tátil; Janela de visualização; Outro
es: Características del horno: Estantes regulables; Apagado automático; Aislamiento de fibra cerámica; Controlador digital; Eficiencia energética; Sistema de ventilación de escape; Puertos de observación/mirilla; Portátil; Ciclos de cocción programables; Calentamiento rápido; Cable de alimentación reversible; Construcción seccional; Función de mantenimiento de temperatura; Pantalla táctil; Ventana de visualización; Otros
sk-SK: Vlastnosti pece: Nastaviteľné police; Automatické vypnutie; Izolácia z keramických vlákien; Digitálny ovládač; Energeticky efektívny; Odťahový ventilačný systém; Pozorovacie/kukátkové otvory; Prenosný; Programovateľné vypaľovacie cykly; Rýchly ohrev; Obojstranný napájací kábel; Sekciová konštrukcia; Funkcia udržiavania teploty; Dotykový displej; Pozorovacie okno; Iné
sl-SI: Značilnosti peči: Nastavljive police; Samodejni izklop; Izolacija iz keramičnih vlaken; Digitalni krmilnik; Energetsko učinkovita; Sistem odvoda zraka; Odprtine za opazovanje/kukala; Prenosno; Programabilni cikli žganja; Hitro segrevanje; Obrnljiv napajalni kabel; Sekcijska konstrukcija; Funkcija vzdrževanja temperature; Zaslon na dotik; Okno za opazovanje; Drugo
da: Ovnfunktioner: Justerbare hylder; Automatisk sluk; Keramisk fiberisolering; Digital styreenhed; Energieffektiv; Udstødningsventilationssystem; Observations-/kikhulsporte; Transportabel; Programmerbare brændingscyklusser; Hurtig opvarmning; Vendbart strømkabel; Sektionskonstruktion; Temperaturholdefunktion; Touchskærm; Kigvindue; Andet
ko: 가마 기능: 조절식 선반; 자동 전원 끄기; 세라믹 섬유 단열; 디지털 컨트롤러; 에너지 효율적; 배기 환기 시스템; 관찰/관찰구 포트; 이동식; 프로그래밍 가능한 소성 사이클; 빠른 예열; 양방향 전원 코드; 분할 구조; 온도 유지 기능; 터치스크린; 관찰창; 기타
pl: Cechy pieca: Regulowane półki; Automatyczne wyłączanie zasilania; Izolacja z włókna ceramicznego; Cyfrowy regulator; Energooszczędność; System wentylacji wywiewnej; Otwory obserwacyjne/wizjery; Przenośny; Programowalne cykle wypalania; Szybkie nagrzewanie; Odwracalny przewód zasilający; Konstrukcja segmentowa; Funkcja utrzymywania temperatury; Ekran dotykowy; Okno obserwacyjne; Inne
ja: 窯の機能: 調節可能な棚; オートパワーオフ; セラミックファイバー断熱材; デジタルコントローラー; エネルギー効率; 排気ベントシステム; 観察窓/のぞき穴; ポータブル; プログラム可能な焼成サイクル; 急速加熱; リバーシブル電源コード; セクション構造; 温度保持機能; タッチスクリーン; 観察窓; その他
hr-HR: Značajke peći: Podesive police; Automatsko isključivanje; Izolacija keramičkim vlaknima; Digitalni regulator; Energetski učinkovito; Sustav ispušne ventilacije; Otvori za promatranje/špijunke; Prijenosni; Programabilni ciklusi pečenja; Brzo zagrijavanje; Reverzibilni kabel za napajanje; Sekcijska konstrukcija; Funkcija držanja temperature; Zaslon osjetljiv na dodir; Prozor za promatranje; Ostalo
sv: Ugnsfunktioner: Justerbara hyllor; Automatisk avstängning; Keramisk fiberisolering; Digital kontroll; Energieffektiv; Frånluftsventilationssystem; Observations-/titthålsöppningar; Bärbar; Programmerbara bränningscykler; Snabb uppvärmning; Reversibel nätsladd; Sektionskonstruktion; Temperaturhållningsfunktion; Pekskärm; Visningsfönster; Övrigt
zh-CN: 窑炉特征: 可调搁板; 自动关机; 陶瓷纤维绝缘; 数字控制器; 高效能; 排气通风系统; 观察口/窥视孔; 便携式; 可编程烧制周期; 快速升温; 可逆电源线; 分段式结构; 温度保持功能; 触摸屏拨号; 观察窗; 其他
lt-LT: Krosnies funkcijos: Reguliuojamos lentynos; Automatinis išjungimas; Keraminės pluošto izoliacija; Skaitmeninis valdiklis; Energiją taupantis; Išmetimo ventiliacijos sistema; Stebėjimo/žiūrėjimo angos; Nešiojama; Programuojami degimo ciklai; Greitas įkaitimas; Apverčiamas maitinimo laidas; Sekcijinė konstrukcija; Temperatūros palaikymo funkcija; Jutiklinis ekranas; Žiūrėjimo langas; Kita
hu: Kemence jellemzői: Állítható polcok; Automatikus kikapcsolás; Kerámia szálas szigetelés; Digitális vezérlő; Energiahatékony; Elszívó rendszer; Megfigyelő/kukucskáló nyílások; Hordozható; Programozható égetési ciklusok; Gyors felfűtés; Megfordítható tápkábel; Szekciós felépítés; Hőmérséklet tartó funkció; Érintőképernyő; Betekintő ablak; Egyéb
el: Χαρακτηριστικά κλιβάνου: Ρυθμιζόμενα ράφια; Αυτόματη απενεργοποίηση; Μόνωση κεραμικής ίνας; Ψηφιακός ελεγκτής; Ενεργειακά αποδοτικό; Σύστημα εξαερισμού; Θυρίδες παρατήρησης; Φορητό; Προγραμματιζόμενοι κύκλοι ψησίματος; Γρήγορη θέρμανση; Αναστρέψιμο καλώδιο τροφοδοσίας; Τμηματική κατασκευή; Λειτουργία διατήρησης θερμοκρασίας; Οθόνη αφής; Παράθυρο θέασης; Άλλο
nl: Ovenkenmerken: Verstelbare planken; Automatisch uitschakelen; Keramische vezelisolatie; Digitale bediening; Energiezuinig; Afzuigsysteem; Kijkgaten/observatiepoorten; Draagbaar; Programmeerbare stookcycli; Snel opwarmen; Omkeerbare stroomkabel; Sectionale constructie; Temperatuur vasthouden functie; Touchscreen; Kijkvenster; Andere
th: คุณสมบัติเตาเผา: ชั้นวางแบบปรับได้; ปิดเครื่องอัตโนมัติ; ฉนวนใยเซรามิก; ตัวควบคุมดิจิทัล; ประหยัดพลังงาน; ระบบระบายอากาศ; ช่องสังเกต/ช่องมองขนาดเล็ก; แบบพกพา; รอบการเผาโปรแกรมได้; อุ่นเร็ว; สายไฟกลับด้านได้; โครงสร้างแบบแยกส่วน; ฟังก์ชันคงอุณหภูมิ; แบบทัชสกรีน; หน้าต่างมอง; อื่นๆ
de: Funktionen des Brennofens: Verstellbare Regale; Automatische Abschaltung; Keramikfaser-Isolierung; Digitale Steuerung; Energieeffizient; Abluft-System; Beobachtungs-/Schauöffnungen; Tragbar; Programmierbare Brennzyklen; Schnelles Aufheizen; Umkehrbares Stromkabel; Modulare Bauweise; Temperatur-Haltefunktion; Touchscreen; Sichtfenster; Sonstiges
fi: Uunin ominaisuudet: Säädettävät hyllyt; Automaattinen virrankatkaisu; Keramiikkakuitueriste; Digitaalinen ohjain; Energiatehokas; Poistoilmanvaihtojärjestelmä; Tarkkailu-/katseluaukot; Siirrettävät; Ohjelmoitavat polttosyklit; Nopea kuumennus; Käännettävä virtajohto; Osiorakenne; Lämpötilan ylläpitotoiminto; Kosketusnäyttö; Katseluikkuna; Muu
nb: Ovnfunksjoner: Regulerbare hyller; Automatisk avslåing; Keramisk fiberisolasjon; Digital kontroller; Energieffektiv; Avtrekkssystem; Observasjonsporter/kikkhull; Bærbar; Programmerbare brennesykluser; Rask oppvarming; Reversibel strømledning; Seksjonsbygget konstruksjon; Temperaturstyringsfunksjon; Berøringsskjerm; Utsiktsvindu; Annet
zh-TW: 窯爐特點: 層架可調; 自動關機; 陶瓷纖維隔熱; 數位控制器; 省電; 排氣通風系統; 觀察孔/窺視孔; 可攜式; 可程式燒製週期; 快速升溫; 可換向電源線; 分段式結構; 溫度保持功能; 觸控螢幕; 觀察窗; 其他
bg-BG: Характеристики на пещта: Регулируеми рафтове; Автоматично изключване на захранването; Керамична влакнеста изолация; Цифров контролер; Енергийна ефективност; Изпускателна вентилационна система; Наблюдателни отвори; Преносима; Програмируеми цикли на изпичане; Бързо загряване; Обратим захранващ кабел; Секционна конструкция; Функция за задържане на температура; Сензорен екран; Прозорец за наблюдение; Други
ro-RO: Caracteristici ale cuptorului: Rafturi reglabile; Oprire automată; Izolație din fibră ceramică; Controler digital; Eficiență energetică; Sistem de ventilație cu evacuare; Orificii de observare/vizor; Portabilă; Cicluri de ardere programabile; Încălzire rapidă; Cablu de alimentare reversibil; Construcție secțională; Funcție de menținere a temperaturii; Ecran tactil; Fereastră de vizualizare; Altele
vi: Tính năng lò nung: Điều chỉnh được kệ; Tự động tắt nguồn; Cách nhiệt sợi gốm; Bộ điều khiển kỹ thuật số; Sử dụng năng lượng hiệu quả; Hệ thống thông gió; Lỗ quan sát; Xách tay; Chu trình nung có thể lập trình; Làm nóng nhanh; Dây nguồn có thể đảo chiều; Cấu trúc theo phần; Chức năng giữ nhiệt độ; Màn hình cảm ứng; Cửa sổ quan sát; Khác
en: Kiln features: Adjustable shelves; Auto power-off; Ceramic fiber insulation; Digital controller; Energy efficient; Exhaust vent system; Observation/Peephole ports; Portable; Programmable firing cycles; Quick heat up; Reversible power cord; Sectional construction; Temperature hold function; Touchscreen; Viewing window; Other
it: Caratteristiche del forno: Ripiani regolabili; Arresto automatico; Isolamento in fibra ceramica; Controller digitale; Efficiente; Sistema di ventilazione di scarico; Porte di osservazione/spioncino; Portatile; Cicli di cottura programmabili; Riscaldamento rapido; Cavo di alimentazione reversibile; Costruzione modulare; Funzione di mantenimento della temperatura; Touchscreen; Finestra di osservazione; Altro
ru: Характеристики печи: Регулируемые полки; Автоматическое выключение; Керамическая волоконная изоляция; Цифровой контроллер; Энергоэффективный; Система вытяжной вентиляции; Смотровые/глазковые отверстия; Портативная; Программируемые циклы обжига; Быстрый нагрев; Реверсивный шнур питания; Секционная конструкция; Функция удержания температуры; Сенсорный набор; Смотровое окно; Другой
cs: Vlastnosti pece: Nastavitelné police; Automatické vypnutí; Izolace z keramických vláken; Digitální ovladač; Energeticky úsporné; Odvětrávací systém; Pozorovací/průzorové otvory; Přenosné; Programovatelné vypalovací cykly; Rychlý ohřev; Oboustranný napájecí kabel; Sekční konstrukce; Funkce udržení teploty; Dotyková obrazovka; Průzorové okno; Jiné
tr: Fırın özellikleri: Ayarlanabilir raflar; Otomatik kapanma; Seramik fiber yalıtım; Dijital kontrolör; Verimli enerji; Egzoz havalandırma sistemi; Gözlem/gözetleme delikleri; Taşınabilir; Programlanabilir pişirme döngüleri; Hızlı ısınma; Çift yönlü güç kablosu; Modüler yapı; Sıcaklık tutma fonksiyonu; Dokunmatik ekran; Görüntüleme penceresi; Diğer
pt-BR: Características do forno: Prateleiras ajustáveis; Desligamento automático; Isolamento com fibra cerâmica; Controlador digital; Eficiência energética; Sistema de exaustão; Portas de observação/visor; Portátil; Ciclos de queima programáveis; Aquecimento rápido; Cabo de energia reversível; Construção em seções; Função de manter temperatura; Tela sensível ao toque; Janela de visualização; Outro